California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
Population changes based on a federal or state special census or estimate validated by the Department of Finance shall be accepted by the Controller only if certified to them at the request of the Department of Finance. The request shall be made only if the census or estimate is greater than the current certified population and shall become effective on the first day of the month following receipt of the certification.

The Department of Finance may assess a reasonable charge, not to exceed the
 actual cost thereof, for the preparation of population estimates pursuant to this section, which is a proper charge against the city, county, or city and county applying therefor. The amount received shall be deposited in the State Treasury as a reimbursement to be credited to the appropriation from which the expenditure is made.

As of May 1, 1988, any population estimate prepared by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 2227 may be used for all purposes of this section unless a written request not to certify is received by the department from the city, city and county, or county within 25 days of completion of the estimate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 137.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.

(a) Commencing on December 31, 2001, the Controller, in consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of Finance, shall recalculate the distribution of the amount of motor vehicle license fees paid by commercial vehicles that are subject to Section 9400.1 of the Vehicle Code and transfer the following sums from the General Fund in the following order:

(1) An amount sufficient to cover all allocations and interception of funds associated with all pledges, liens, encumbrances and priorities as set forth in Section 25350.6 of the Government Code, which shall be transferred so as to pay that allocation.

(2) An amount sufficient to continue allocations to the State Treasury to the credit of the Vehicle License Fee Account of the Local Revenue Fund, as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, which would be in the same amount had the amendments made by the act that added this section to Section 10752 of the Revenue and Taxation Code not been enacted, which shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Vehicle License Fee Account of the Local Revenue Fund, as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. This paragraph shall be inoperative commencing with
 the 2010–11 fiscal year.

(3) An amount sufficient to continue allocations to the State Treasury to the credit of the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund, as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, which would be in the same amount had the amendments made by the act that added this section to Section 10752 of the Revenue and Taxation Code not been enacted, which shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account of the Local Revenue Fund, as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) An amount sufficient to cover all allocations and interception of funds associated with all pledges, liens, encumbrances and priorities, other than those referred to in paragraph (1), as set forth in Section 25350 and following of, Section 53584 and following
 of, 5450 and following of, the Government Code, which shall be transferred so as to pay those allocations.

(b) The balance of any funds not otherwise allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall continue to be deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund and allocated to each city, county, and city and county as otherwise provided by law.

(c) In enacting paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a), the Legislature declares that paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a), shall not be construed to obligate the State of California to make any payment to a city, city and county, or county from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund in any amount or pursuant to any particular allocation formula, or to make any other payment to a city, city and county, or county, including, but not limited to, any payment in
 satisfaction of any debt or liability incurred or so guaranteed if the State of California had not so bound itself prior to the enactment of this section.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), on and after July 1, 2010, that amount equal to the amount that would have been transferred pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) had the act adding this subdivision not been enacted, shall not be transferred from the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 719, Sec. 55.   (SB 856)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Transportation Improvement Fee [11050. - 11053.]

11050.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Transportation purposes” means both of the following:

(1) The research, planning, construction, improvement, maintenance, and operation of public streets and highways (and their related public facilities for
 nonmotorized traffic), including the mitigation of their environmental effects, the payment for property taken or damaged for the foregoing purposes, and the administrative costs necessarily incurred in the foregoing purposes.

(2) The research, planning, construction, improvement, maintenance, and operation of public transportation systems (and their related equipment and fixed facilities), including the mitigation of their environmental effects, the payment for property taken or damaged for the foregoing purposes, and the administrative costs necessarily incurred in the foregoing purposes.

(b) “Transportation improvement fee” means a supplemental charge added to the fee imposed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10751).

(c) “Vehicle” means every vehicle that is subject to the fee in Chapter 2 (commencing
 with Section 10751), except the following:

(1) A commercial vehicle with an unladen weight of more than 10,000 pounds.

(2) A vehicle exempted pursuant to the Vehicle Code from the payment of registration fees.

(3) A vehicle for which a certificate of nonoperation has been filed with the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 4604 of the Vehicle Code, during the period of time covered by the certificate.

(4) A vehicle described in Section 5004 of the Vehicle Code.

(5) A vehicle issued apportioned registration pursuant to the International Registration Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 11.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11051.

(a) In addition to any other fee imposed on a vehicle by this code or the Vehicle Code, a transportation improvement fee is hereby imposed on each vehicle as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 11050 effective on January 1, 2018, or as soon after that date as the department is able to commence collection of the fee. The transportation improvement fee shall be in the amounts specified in Section
 11052.

(b) The department shall collect the fee at the same time and in the same manner as the department collects the vehicle registration fee pursuant to Section 9250 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) The fee imposed pursuant to this chapter is imposed for the privilege of a resident of California to operate upon the public highways a vehicle or trailer coach, the registrant of which is subject to the fee under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10751).

(d) The revenues from the transportation improvement fee imposed by this chapter shall be available for expenditure only on transportation purposes as provided in Section 11053.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 12.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11052.

(a) The annual amount of the transportation improvement fee shall be based on the market value of the vehicle, as determined by the department pursuant to Sections 10753, 10753.2, and 10753.5, using the following schedule:

(1) Vehicles with a vehicle market value range between zero dollars ($0) and four thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($4,999), a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25).

(2) Vehicles with a vehicle market value range between five thousand dollars ($5,000) and twenty-four thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($24,999), a fee of fifty dollars ($50).

(3) Vehicles with a vehicle market value range between twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and thirty-four thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($34,999), a fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(4) Vehicles with a vehicle market value range between thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) and fifty-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($59,999), a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(5) Vehicles with a vehicle market value range of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) and higher, a fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175).

(b) On January 1, 2020, and every January 1 thereafter, the department shall adjust the transportation improvement fee imposed under subdivision (a) by increasing the fee for each vehicle market range in an amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index for the prior year, except the first adjustment shall cover the prior two years, as calculated by the Department of Finance, with amounts equal to or greater than fifty cents ($0.50) rounded to the highest whole dollar. The incremental change shall be added to the associated fee rate for that year.

(c) Any changes to the transportation improvement fee imposed in subdivision (a) that are enacted by the Legislature subsequent to January 1, 2018, shall be deemed to be changes to the base fee for purposes of the California Consumer Price Index calculation and adjustment performed pursuant to subdivision
 (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 31.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11053.

Revenues from the transportation improvement fee, after deduction of the department’s administrative costs related to this chapter, shall be transferred by the department to the Controller for deposit as follows:

(a) Commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), plus an annual increase for inflation as determined in subdivision
 (b) of Section 11052 for this proportional share, shall annually be deposited into the Public Transportation Account. The Controller shall, each month, transfer one-twelfth of this amount, except in the 2017–18 fiscal year, when the Controller shall transfer one-sixth of this amount, to accumulate a total of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) plus the inflation adjustment amount in each fiscal year. The Controller may adjust the amount transferred in the final month or months of each fiscal year if necessary to achieve the annual amount specified in this subdivision. For each fiscal year commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, the annual Budget Act shall include an appropriation for 70 percent of these revenues to be allocated to the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program (Part 2 (commencing with Section 75220) of Division 44 of the Public Resources Code), pursuant to Section 99312.4 of the Public Utilities Code. The remaining 30 percent of these revenues shall be continuously
 appropriated to the Controller for allocation under the State Transit Assistance Program, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99312.1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) Commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) shall annually be deposited into the State Highway Account for appropriation by the annual Budget Act to the Solutions for Congested Corridor Program created pursuant to Section 2391 of the Streets and Highways Code. The Controller shall, each month, transfer one-twelfth of this amount, except in the 2017–18 fiscal year, when the Controller shall transfer one-sixth of this amount, to accumulate a total of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in each fiscal year. The Controller may adjust the amount transferred in the final month or months of each fiscal year if necessary to achieve the annual amount specified in this subdivision.

(c) The remaining revenues after the transfers made in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be deposited into the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account created pursuant to Section 2031 of the Streets and Highway Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 189.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.5. LOCAL VEHICLE LICENSE FEES [11101. - 11108.]

11101.

This part is applicable only in a county which has adopted a general plan providing for a network of county expressways and has financed the first phase of the construction of such highways from a county highway bond issue totaling at least seventy million dollars ($70,000,000). This part is necessary to provide needed revenue to continue further construction of such an expressway system without increasing the property tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

As used in this part, “department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10758 of this code, the board of supervisors of a county may, by ordinance, adopt a vehicle license fee pursuant to this part. After a local vehicle license fee has been levied pursuant to this part, it may not be collected more than twice unless the board of supervisors shall have submitted to the voters at a general or special election and at least a majority of those voting have voted affirmatively on the following question:

“Shall the local vehicle license fee be continued as the means to finance the county expressway program?”

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.

No vehicle license fee ordinance adopted pursuant to this part shall be effective for any calendar year prior to 1968, nor unless it is adopted and a certified copy thereof delivered to the Department of Motor Vehicles at least four months prior to the first day of January for the calendar year for which it is to be operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.

A vehicle license fee ordinance adopted pursuant to this part may be repealed by action of the board of supervisors of the county. A repeal of any vehicle license fee ordinance adopted pursuant to this part shall not be effective for any calendar year unless the board of supervisors takes action to repeal the ordinance at least four months prior to the first day of January the year for which it is to be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.

The vehicle license fee ordinance adopted under this part shall be imposed for the privilege of operating upon the public highways in the county any vehicle of a type which is subject to registration under the Vehicle Code unless specifically exempt under the terms of the ordinance, and shall include provisions in substance as follows:

(a) A provision fixing the annual amount of the license fee which shall be an amount not exceeding ten dollars ($10) for every vehicle of a type subject to registration under the Vehicle Code. The ordinance may provide a different fee for any class of vehicles provided no fee
 shall exceed ten dollars ($10) per vehicle.

(b) Provisions identical to those contained in Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of this code, insofar as they relate to vehicle license fees and are applicable, except that the name of the county as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state, and that the term “vehicle of a type subject to registration under the Vehicle Code” does not include (1) any vehicle in the inventory of vehicles held for sale by a manufacturer, distributor or dealer in the course of his business until such time as the vehicle is sold, (2) any trailer coach, or (3) any class of vehicles specifically made exempt from the vehicle license fees authorized by this part by the terms of the ordinance imposing such fees.

(c) A provision that all amendments, subsequent
 to the effective date of the county vehicle license fee ordinance, to Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of this code relating to vehicle license fees and not inconsistent with this part, shall automatically become a part of the county vehicle license fee ordinance.

(d) A provision that the county contract with the Department of Motor Vehicles to perform all functions incident to the administration or operation of the vehicle license fee ordinance of the county.

(e) A provision that the vehicle license fee ordinance shall become operative on the first day of January of the year next succeeding the year in which the ordinance is adopted, subject to the provisions of Section 11104.

(f) A provision that the total revenue derived from any vehicle license fee ordinance, less any costs charged by the
 Department of Motor Vehicles for its services, shall be distributed to the county for the construction (as defined in Section 29 of the Streets and Highways Code) of a county expressway system or the select system of a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.

All vehicle license fees shall be collected by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to a contract with the county and shall be transmitted to the county by the department periodically as promptly as feasible, and the department shall charge the county for the department’s services specified in this section and Section 11106 such amount as will reimburse the department for the actual additional cost to it in rendering the services. Refunds to licensees pursuant to Part 5 of Division 2 of this code as incorporated in the vehicle license fee ordinance shall be made and administered as provided in such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.

A person shall, for the purposes provided in this part, be presumed to be operating a vehicle on the public highways only in the county of residence as it is reflected in the registration records of the Department of Motor Vehicles and he shall be subject to a vehicle license fee under this part only in that county. The department is authorized to establish administrative procedures for the collection of vehicle license fees. In determining the place of residence of a person the department shall be entitled to rely upon the address reflected in its records unless any such person or persons or county or district shall establish to the satisfaction of the department that the
 place of residence is elsewhere.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.6. LOCAL VEHICLE LICENSE FEE SURCHARGE [11151. - 11156.]

11151.

(a) For purposes of this part, “department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(b) For purposes of this part, “county” means the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 966, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 11152.5.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 11152.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11152.

The county may impose a local vehicle license fee surcharge if both of the following occur:

(a) The board of supervisors finds both of the following:

(1) That there is traffic congestion within the county that can be alleviated by the operation of public transit and that the cost of funding public transit exceeds the revenues to be
 collected from a vehicle license fee surcharge.

(2) That the imposition of the vehicle license fee surcharge will reduce the need for any public transit fare increases during the period that the vehicle license fee surcharge is in effect.

(b) The ordinance or resolution proposing the surcharge is adopted by two-thirds of the voters of the county voting on the issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 966, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 11152.5.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 11152.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11152.5.

If public transit fares are increased at any time while the vehicle license fee surcharge authorized by this part is in effect, the surcharge may not continue to be imposed.

This part shall become inoperative on the date those fares are increased and
 shall be repealed on January 1 next following that date. The board of supervisors shall notify the department of any increase in public transit fares occurring while the surcharge is in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 966, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Termination clause affects Part 5.6, comprising Sections 11151 to 11156.)
-------------------------------------------

11153.

A vehicle license fee surcharge ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this part shall be operative on January 1 of the year following adoption of the ordinance or resolution. A local vehicle license fee surcharge shall apply to any original registration occurring on or after that January 1, and to any renewal of registration with an expiration date on or after that January 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 966, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 11152.5.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 11152.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11154.

The local vehicle license fee surcharge shall be imposed for the privilege of operating upon the public highways in the county any vehicle of a type that is subject to registration under the Vehicle Code, except those vehicles expressly exempted from payment of vehicle registration fees and commercial vehicles weighing more than 4,000 pounds, unladen, and shall include provisions in substance as follows:

(a) A provision that the annual amount of the local vehicle license fee surcharge shall be a sum equal to not more than 15 percent of the vehicle license fee imposed pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701).

(b) A provision that the county contract prior to the effective date of the local vehicle license fee surcharge ordinance or resolution with the department to perform all functions incident to the administration or operation of the local vehicle license fee surcharge ordinance or resolution of the county.

(c) A provision that the revenue derived from any vehicle license fee surcharge ordinance or resolution imposed pursuant to this part shall be distributed to the county for use exclusively for the provision of public transit, including capital outlay, security, and maintenance costs, and including, but not limited to, removal of graffiti from public
 transit vehicles and facilities, and to pay the costs of compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 11152.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 966, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 11152.5.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 11152.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11155.

All local vehicle license fee surcharge revenues, less refunds, collected by the department pursuant to a contract with a county, after deduction of the administrative costs incurred by the department in carrying out this part, shall be paid to that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 966, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 11152.5.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 11152.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11156.

A person shall, for the purposes provided for in Section 11154, be presumed to be operating a vehicle on the public highways only in the county in which he or she resides, or, in the case of other than a natural person, only in the county in which the vehicle is principally garaged, and he or she shall be subject to a local vehicle license fee surcharge only in that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 966, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 11152.5.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 11152.5.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.7. VOTER-APPROVED LOCAL ASSESSMENT [11160. - 11167.]

11160.

This part is applicable only to the City and County of San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11161.

For purposes of this part:

(a) “Board of supervisors” means the board of supervisors of the city and county.

(b) “City and county” means the City and County of San Francisco.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(d) “Market value” has the same meaning and shall be determined in the same manner as required under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2.

(e) “Person” includes an individual, a firm, a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, or any other legal entity.

(f) “Resident of the city and county” means a person whose address, as reflected in department registration records, is in the city and county, but does not include a person that establishes to the satisfaction of the department that the person’s place of residence is elsewhere.

(g) “Voter-approved local assessment” means a supplemental charge added to the fee imposed pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11162.

Notwithstanding Section 10758, the board of supervisors may, by ordinance, impose a voter-approved local assessment for general revenue purposes pursuant to this part, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The ordinance proposing the assessment complies with both of the following:

(1) Section 11163.

(2) Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 53720) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(b) The ordinance proposing the assessment is approved by two-thirds of all members of the board of supervisors.

(c) The ordinance proposing the assessment is submitted to the electorate of the city and county and is approved by a majority vote of the voters voting on the ordinance.

(d) The board of supervisors transmits to the department and the Franchise Tax Board a certified copy of the ordinance imposing that assessment immediately after the results of the election described in subdivision (c) are certified.

(e) The ordinance proposing the assessment does not create different classes of vehicles (whether by type, size,
 passenger capacity, value or cost, fuel consumption, or any other characteristic) for differential taxation (whether by rate, method, assessment ratio, or any other means), except that the exemptions from the vehicle license fee set forth in Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) shall be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.

An ordinance imposing a voter-approved local assessment pursuant to this part shall contain provisions in substance as follows:

(a) A provision that the assessment is imposed for the privilege of a resident of the city and county to operate upon the public highways in the city and county a vehicle or trailer coach, the registrant of which is subject to tax under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701).

(b) (1) A provision establishing the annual amount of the assessment at a rate that equals the difference between the following two rates:

(A) Two percent of the market value of the vehicle or trailer coach.

(B) The rate, including any offset to that rate, set forth in Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701), for a vehicle or trailer coach.

(2) A provision that the rate established under the provision described in paragraph (1) is subject to both of the following:

(A) That the rate may not exceed 2 percent of the market value of the vehicle or trailer coach.

(B) That any adjustment that is required to be
 made to the rate because of a change in the rate, or any offset to that rate, set forth in Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701), shall not take effect until the first day of the first fiscal year that follows the fiscal year in which the change to the rate or offset set forth in that part became operative.

(c) A provision that the assessment will begin to be imposed as follows:

(1) If the election in which the ordinance receives voter approval occurs between January 1 and June 30, on the first January 1 that follows that election.

(2) If the election in which the ordinance receives voter approval occurs between July 1 and December 31, on the first July 1 that follows that election.

(d) Provisions identical to those contained in Part 5 (commencing with
 Section 10701), insofar as they relate to vehicle license fees and are applicable, and insofar as they are consistent with this part, except that the name of the city and county as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state.

(e) A provision that all amendments, subsequent to the effective date of the voter-approved local assessment ordinance, to Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) relating to vehicle license fees and not inconsistent with this part, shall automatically be incorporated into the voter-approved local assessment ordinance.

(f) A provision that requires the city and county to contract with the department, which contract shall contain provisions in substance as follows:

(1) A requirement that the department perform all functions incident to the administration and collection of the
 voter-approved local assessment.

(2) A provision specifying the manner in which refunds pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701), as incorporated in the voter-approved local assessment ordinance pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d), will be made and administered.

(3) A provision that requires the city and county to pay the department for the initial setup and programming costs identified by the department.

(4) A provision specifying the manner in which reimbursements to the state shall be made in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 11167 after the inoperation or repeal of a voter-approved local assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11163.2.

Any ordinance approved pursuant to Section 11163 shall be valid and enforceable even if approved, as required by Section 11162, by the board of supervisors and by the voters prior to the effective date of the act adding this section, but only if both of the following apply:

(a) Any assessment imposed pursuant to the approval of the ordinance is not levied until at least 90 days after the effective date of the act adding
 this section.

(b) The board of supervisors ratifies its adoption of the ordinance after the effective date of the act adding this section and prior to the first levy of the assessment imposed pursuant to the approval of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11164.

The department shall do all of the following:

(a) Collect the voter-approved local assessment, pursuant to a contract with the city and county, and deposit it into the San Francisco Vehicle Assessment Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) Calculate its costs in administering the voter-approved local assessment pursuant to this part.

(c) From the assessments collected under subdivision (a), calculate the amount reported under subdivision (a) of Section 11166 as appropriately adjusted, if applicable, by the most recent amount reported under subdivision (b) of Section 11166.

(d) Transmit revenues derived from the assessments collected under subdivision (a), minus the amount currently outstanding that has been calculated under subdivisions (b) and (c), to the city and county as promptly as feasible. The moneys necessary to accomplish the transfer shall be continuously appropriated for that purpose.

(e) The department and the Franchise Tax Board shall develop a reporting process that enables the department to report to the Franchise Tax Board in a timely manner the data necessary for the Franchise Tax Board to prepare the estimate of revenue loss
 specified in Section 11166.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11165.

(a) This part shall not be construed to supplant any moneys that the state apportions to the city and county, including, but not limited to, moneys apportioned to the city and county under the Vehicle License Fee Law set forth in Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701), or any successor to that law.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, if the city and county that imposes a voter-approved local assessment
 has a reduction in revenue derived from that assessment because of an increase in the rate, including any offset to that rate, set forth in Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) for a vehicle or a trailer coach, reimbursement by the state shall not be made to the city and county for that loss in revenue.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.

(a) On or before January 1 of the year that follows a year, or portion thereof, in which an assessment is imposed pursuant to this part, and annually thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall report to the department an estimate of the total amount of the revenue loss to the state that is expected to occur in the next calendar year, for a report given before January 1, or the current calendar year, for a report given on January 1, from deductions taken under the
 Personal Income Tax Law (Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001)) and the Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001)) for taxes paid or incurred as a result of an enacted tax being imposed pursuant to this part.

(b) On or before January 1 of the second year that follows a year, or portion thereof, in which an assessment is imposed pursuant to this part, and annually thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall report to the department a revision of the applicable previous estimate made pursuant to subdivision (a), based on actual filings and returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11167.

For any revisions to previous estimates made by the Franchise Tax Board on or after January 1 following the inoperation or repeal of a voter-approved local assessment pursuant to Section 11166, the following shall apply:

(a) (1) In the event that the Franchise Tax Board’s reported estimate, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11166, exceeds the revision of that estimate, pursuant to subdivision (b)
 of Section 11166, the city and county shall be reimbursed by the Controller from the San Francisco Vehicle Assessment Fund.

(2) The money in the San Francisco Vehicle Assessment Fund is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the purposes enumerated in this subdivision.

(b) In the event that the Franchise Tax Board’s reported estimate, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11166, is less than the revision of that estimate, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11166, the state shall be reimbursed by the city and county. The reimbursement pursuant to this subdivision shall be performed as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 11163.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 11166, any revision of an applicable previous estimate shall not be reported to the department and shall be
 reported to the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. PRIVATE RAILROAD CAR TAX [11201. - 11702.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [11201. - 11206.]

11201.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Private Railroad Car Tax Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1209.)
-------------------------------------------

11202.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11203.

(a) “Private railroad car” includes any railroad rolling stock intended for the transportation of any persons, commodity, or material, operated on the railroads of this state, which car is owned by a person other than a railroad or the National Railroad Passenger Corporation. The car’s Association of American Railroad’s, or successor organization’s, reporting mark shall be rebuttably presumed to be the mark of the car owner.

(b) “Private railroad car” does not include:

(1) Freight train or passenger train cars owned by railroad companies which are used or subject to use under the ordinary per diem agreement common to all railroads.

(2) Freight train or passenger cars handled under mileage or through line contract arrangements between railroad companies.

(3) Cars owned by or leased to any railroad company operating in this state, or by any railroad company operated as a part of the same railroad system as the company operating in this state, and used by the railroad company in the operation, maintenance, construction, or reconstruction of its property and assessed and taxed in this state as a part of the property of a railroad company operating in this state.

(4) Passenger train cars that are privately owned and for which
 the owner pays the railroad a fee, regardless of how calculated, for transporting the cars.

(5) Any railroad rolling stock for which a railroad or the National Railroad Passenger Corporation is the lessee. For a leased car, the car’s Association of American Railroad’s, or successor organization’s reporting mark is rebuttably presumed to be the mark of the lessee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   Effective July 31, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11204.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, syndicate, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 50.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11205.

“In this State” or “in the State” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

11206.
